Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1336
Mobile tracking devices; terms; defined.

For purposes of sections 28-1336 to 28-1339:

(1) Business entity means any form of corporation, company, partnership, association, cooperative, joint venture, business trust, or sole proprietorship that conducts business in this state;

(2) Mobile tracking device means any physical device, digital application, software, firmware, account setting, or technological configuration that is used to collect, transmit, record, or disclose information regarding the position or movement of an individual;

(3) Private investigator means a person licensed under sections 71-3201 to 71-3213;

(4) Protection order means any protection order issued or recognized under the Protection Orders Act;

(5) Senior adult has the same meaning as in section 28-366.01; and

(6) Vulnerable adult has the same meaning as in section 28-371.

Laws 2026, LB935, § 13.
July 18, 2026
Protection Orders Act, see section 26-101.